District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.36a

Discontinuation of supportive housing services.

(a)

A provider may discontinue supportive housing services for a client only when the client has:

(1)

Relocated to another program or facility for more than 180 days;

(2)

Abandoned his or her unit for more than 60 days and good-faith efforts to locate the client have failed, or the client has been located but has indicated by words or actions that he or she does not intend to return to and reside in the unit; or

(3)

The client has not requested a reasonable accommodation to continue the supportive housing services for disability-related reasons, or has requested a reasonable accommodation and it was denied; and

(4)

No household members who have been approved as part of the household unit for purposes of the program remain in the supportive housing placement.

(b)

Providers of supportive housing shall give oral and written notice, in accordance with § 4-754.33(d), to clients of their discontinuation from services only after the required time period in subsection (a) of this section has lapsed, except where there is credible evidence that the client who has relocated to another program or facility is expected to be absent for more than 180 days. The notice shall be given at least 30 days before the effective date of the discontinuation of services. If it is not possible to provide written notice at the time of the action because the client’s whereabouts are unknown, a written notice shall be delivered to the client’s last known address or, upon request, within 90 days of the discontinuation of services.

(c)

A client whose supportive housing services are discontinued pursuant to this section shall have the right to be re-housed upon return; provided, that the client continues to meet the eligibility criteria for the program and the services are available. If the services are not available from the original supportive housing provider, the client shall receive the first available opening at the original supportive housing provider’s program, unless an opening elsewhere is available and the client consents to the alternate provider. To the extent possible, a provider who is notified of a client’s impending return shall make a reasonable effort to work with the client to arrange supportive housing services that will be available upon the client’s return.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 22a
as added Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5182(h), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5182(h) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5182(h) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5181 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle Q of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Homeless Services Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.